Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Each biennium, the Department of Justice shall include in its agency
request budget filed under ORS 291.208 discrete amounts  necessary to fund the projected
costs of continuing state support  for the following currently authorized programs and ac-
tivities for the next biennium:
(a) Children’s advocacy centers as defined in ORS 418.782;
(b) The Survivor Housing Funds grant program, or any successor program that  provides
funds to assist victims of domestic  violence, sexual assault, stalking, dating violence and
human trafficking to access and maintain safe permanent housing; and
(c) The Oregon Domestic and Sexual Violence Services Fund established under ORS
147.453.
(2) When calculating the amounts described in subsection (1) of this section, the  depart-
ment may include in the total up to 10 percent for department administrative costs.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of  this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 418.746 to
418.796.
SECTION 3. (1) The director of a children’s advocacy center shall  submit to the Depart-
ment of Justice, by no later than April 1 of each  even-numbered year, projected costs of the
center for the next biennium, along with estimates for all sources of funding  other than the
state, including but not limited to insurance reimbursements, court  witness fees, private
donations and governmental grants.
(2) Each director of a  children’s advocacy center submitting information under sub-
section (1) of this section shall certify that the submitted information is true and  correct
and that the accuracy of all numerical information has been verified.
SECTION 4. Section 1 of this 2024 Act applies to biennia beginning on or after July 1,
2025.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4140 (HB 4140-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4140 (HB 4140-A) Page 2